Colorado, session 2026A, HB1228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-245-504, amend
(1)(c) and (1)(d) as follows:
12-245-504. Qualifications - examination - licensure and
registration - rules.
(1) The board shall issue a license as a marriage and family therapist
to each applicant who files an application in a form and manner required by
the board, submits the fee required by the board pursuant to section
12-245-205, and furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the
applicant:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) Has completed a master's or doctoral degree from an accredited
school or college in marriage and family therapy or its equivalent as
determined by the board, and the degree:
(I) Includes a practicum or internship in the principles and practice
of marriage and family therapy; OR
(II) FOR AN APPLICANT APPLYING ON OR AFTER MARCH 1, 2027,
DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRACTICUM OR INTERNSHIP IN THE PRINCIPLES AND
PRACTICE OF MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY, AND THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION ARE MET PRIOR TO LICENSURE AS A
MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST;
(d) Subsequent to completing the applicant's master's or doctoral
degree, has had at least two years of post-master's or one year of
postdoctoral practice in individual and marriage and family therapy,
including at least one thousand five hundred hours, OR, FOR AN APPLICANT
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION, SEVEN HUNDRED
HOURS IN ADDITION TO THE HOURS REQUIRED FOR AN APPLICANT DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (1)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION, of face-to-face direct client
contact as determined by the board for the purpose of assessment and
intervention under clinical supervision that may be in person or THROUGH
telesupervision; and
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1228

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1228